Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3208
Authority; perpetual inventory.

Such authority shall set up and maintain a perpetual inventory on each tract of its real estate, except that individual tracts may be consolidated and grouped or regrouped for economy or convenience.

Laws 1973, LB 73, § 8.